dictsource/bn_rules
        
.group হ
        হ        hV  
        _া) হ (L11া_             h        // generated
        _া) হ (L11া              h        // generated
        _L12া) হ (L11া_          h        // generated
        _L12া) হ (L11া           h        // generated
        _L10) হ (L11ু_           h        // generated
        _L10) হ (L11ু            h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (L11ু_        h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (L11ু         h        // generated
        L10) হ (L11ু_            h        // generated
        L10) হ (L11ু             h        // generated
        _L10) হ (ডL12L10         h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (ডL12L10      h        // generated
        L10) হ (ডL12L10          h        // generated
        _আ) হ (L11L10L11         h        // generated
        _L12আ) হ (L11L10L11      h        // generated
        আ) হ (L11L10L11          h        // generated
        _L10) হ (গL12_           h        // generated
        _L10) হ (গL12            h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (গL12_        h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (গL12         h        // generated
        L10) হ (গL12_            h        // generated
        L10) হ (গL12             h        // generated
        _া) হ (L11L12র           h        // generated
        _L12া) হ (L11L12র        h        // generated
        া) হ (L11L12র            h        // generated
        _ি) হ (L11া_             h        // generated
        _ি) হ (L11া              h        // generated
        _L12ি) হ (L11া_          h        // generated
        _L12ি) হ (L11া           h        // generated
        ি) হ (L11া_              h        // generated
        ি) হ (L11া               h        // generated
        _) হ (তা_                hV       // generated
        _L12) হ (তা_             hV       // generated
        _L12L12) হ (তা_          hV       // generated
        হ (তা_                   hV       // generated
        _L11) হ (L11ন_           h        // generated
        _L11) হ (L11ন            h        // generated
        _L12L11) হ (L11ন_        h        // generated
        _L12L11) হ (L11ন         h        // generated
        _পL12) হ (L11L10_        hV       // generated
        _পL12) হ (L11L10         hV       // generated
        পL12) হ (L11L10_         hV       // generated
        পL12) হ (L11L10          hV       // generated
        _লL10) হ (L11L12L11      h        // generated
        লL10) হ (L11L12L11       h        // generated
        _L10) হ (পL11_           h        // generated
        _L10) হ (পL11            h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (পL11_        h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (পL11         h        // generated
        L10) হ (পL11_            h        // generated
        L10) হ (পL11             h        // generated
        _L10) হ (বL12্           h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (বL12্        h        // generated
        L10) হ (বL12্            h        // generated
        _খL10) হ (_L12           h        // generated
        _খL10) হ (L11L12_        h        // generated
        _খL10) হ (L11L12         h        // generated
        খL10) হ (_L12            h        // generated
        খL10) হ (L11L12_         h        // generated
        খL10) হ (L11L12          h        // generated
        _L11) হ (L11ী_           hV       // generated
        _L11) হ (L11ী            hV       // generated
        _ন) হ (L11L10_           h        // generated
        _ন) হ (L11L10            h        // generated
        _L12ন) হ (L11L10_        h        // generated
        _L12ন) হ (L11L10         h        // generated
        ন) হ (L11L10_            h        // generated
        ন) হ (L11L10             h        // generated
        _জ) হ (L11L10_           h        // generated
        _জ) হ (L11L10            h        // generated
        _L12জ) হ (L11L10_        h        // generated
        _L12জ) হ (L11L10         h        // generated
        জ) হ (L11L10_            h        // generated
        জ) হ (L11L10             h        // generated
        _া) হ (L11ে_             h        // generated
        _া) হ (L11ে              h        // generated
        _L12া) হ (L11ে_          h        // generated
        _L12া) হ (L11ে           h        // generated
        ্L12া) হ (_L12           h        // generated
        _L11L10) হ (হL12_        h        // generated
        _L11L10) হ (হL12         h        // generated
        L11L10) হ (হL12_         h        // generated
        L11L10) হ (হL12          h        // generated
        _L10) হ (লL12য           h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (লL12য        h        // generated
        L10) হ (লL12য            h        // generated
        _L10) হ (চL12_           h        // generated
        _L10) হ (চL12            h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (চL12_        h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (চL12         h        // generated
        _এ) হ (L11L10_           h        // generated
        _এ) হ (L11L10            h        // generated
        _L12এ) হ (L11L10_        h        // generated
        _L12এ) হ (L11L10         h        // generated
        এ) হ (L11L10_            h        // generated
        এ) হ (L11L10             h        // generated
        L10L12L10) হ (L11L12ন    hV       // generated
        _L10) হ (তে_             h        // generated
        _L10) হ (তে              h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (তে_          h        // generated
        _L12L10) হ (তে           h        // generated
        L10) হ (তে_              h        // generated
        L10) হ (তে               h        // generated
        _র) হ (L11াL11           h        // generated
        _L12র) হ (L11াL11        h        // generated
        র) হ (L11াL11            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (তে_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (লে_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (ছে_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (লাম_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (তাম_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (ছি_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (ছিল_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (লো_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (বে_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (বো_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (লেন_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (তেন_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (ছেন_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (বেন_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (তিস_            h        // generated
        _L11) হ (লি_             h        // generated
        _L11) হ (ছিস_            h        // generated
        হ (B     h
        হ (_     ho

        
.group হ্ব
        হ্ব       vV
        হ্ব (B    v

        
.group ৎ
        ৎ        t


.group ড়         // can be ড plus nukta
        ড়        r.V
        ড় (B     r.

       
.group ঢ়         // can be ঢ plus nukta
        ঢ়        hr.V
        ঢ় (B     hr.
        ঢ় (_     hr.o
        


.group ঁ
	C) ঁ	 O~     // candrabindu, nasalize the previous vowel/Consonants

.group ং
       A) ং        N     //  anusvara/onushshor
       C) ং        N     //  anusvara/onushshor
   
.group ঃ              // visarga/bishorgo
        ঃ             // doubles the following consonant
        ঃ (_      H

.group ্		// virama/hoshonto
     C) ্


.group ়
	়		// nukta, modifies a consonant



.group
       // obsolete letters
        ঋ        r-
        ৠ        r-
        ঌ        l-
        ৡ        l-
        ৃ        r-
        ৄ        r-
        ৢ        l-
        ৣ        l-

    __) - (_D    bij'og
    D_) - (_D    bij'og
